Utah statutes.
70A-4a-405.   Payment by beneficiary's bank to beneficiary.
(1)  If a beneficiary's bank credits an account of the beneficiary of a
payment order, payment of the bank's obligation under Subsection 70A-4a-404
(1) occurs when and to the extent:
(a)  the beneficiary is notified of the right to withdraw the credit;
(b)  the bank lawfully applies the credit to a debt of the beneficiary; or
(c)  funds with respect to the order are otherwise made available to the
beneficiary by the bank.
(2)  If the beneficiary's bank does not credit an account of the beneficiary
of a payment order, the time when payment of the bank's obligation under
Subsection 70A-4a-404 (1) is governed by applicable principles of law that
determine when an obligation is satisfied.
(3)  Except as stated in Subsections (4) and (5), if the beneficiary's bank
pays the beneficiary of a payment order under a condition to payment or
agreement of the beneficiary giving the bank the right to recover payment from
the beneficiary if the bank does not receive payment of the order, the
condition to payment or agreement is not enforceable.
(4) (a)  A funds transfer system rule may provide that payments made to
beneficiaries of funds transfers made through the system are provisional until
receipt of payment by the beneficiary's bank of the payment order it accepted.
A beneficiary's bank that makes a payment that is provisional under the rule
is entitled to refund from the beneficiary if:
(i)  the rule requires that both the beneficiary and the originator be given
notice of the provisional nature of the payment before the funds transfer is
initiated;
(ii)  the beneficiary, the beneficiary's bank, and the originator's bank
agreed to be bound by the rule; and
(iii)  the beneficiary's bank did not receive payment of the payment order
that it accepted.
(b)  If the beneficiary is obliged to refund payment to the beneficiary's
bank, acceptance of the payment order by the beneficiary's bank is nullified
and no payment by the originator of the funds transfer to the beneficiary
occurs under Section 70A-4a-406.
(5) (a)  This subsection applies to a funds transfer that includes a payment
order transmitted over a funds transfer system that:
(i)  nets obligations multilaterally among participants; and
(ii)  has in effect a loss-sharing agreement among participants for the
purpose of providing funds necessary to complete settlement of the obligations
of one or more participants that do not meet their settlement obligations.
(b)  If the beneficiary's bank in the funds transfer accepts a payment order
and the system fails to complete settlement pursuant to its rules with respect
to any payment order in the funds transfer:
(i)  the acceptance by the beneficiary's bank is nullified and no person has
any right or obligation based on the acceptance;
(ii)  the beneficiary's bank is entitled to recover payment from the
beneficiary;
(iii)  no payment by the originator to the beneficiary occurs under Section
70A-4a-406; and
(iv)  subject to Subsection 70A-4a-402 (5), each sender in the funds transfer
is excused from its obligation to pay its payment order under Subsection 70A-
4a-402 (3) because the funds transfer has not been completed.
